Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,109
Contract rights of officers.

(MBCA 8.44) (a) The appointment
of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

(b) An officer's removal
does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the corporation.
An officer's resignation does not affect the corporation's contract rights,
if any, with the officer.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 109.